Tennessee, session 114, SB1907.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-210(a), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
( ) "Electrical lineman" means an individual who:
(A) Installs, maintains, or repairs electrical transmission and power
distribution systems; and
(B) Is employed by a local government or an entity that contracts with a
local government for the installation, maintenance, or repair of such systems;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-210(b), is amended by adding
the language "or electrical lineman" after "emergency responder" wherever it may appear.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-210(d), is amended by deleting
the period at the end of the subsection and substituting ", or being both an emergency
responder and an electrical lineman.".
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1907
010527
- 1 -